Washington statutes.
RCW 19.170.010

Finding—Violations—Consumer protection act—Application.

(1) The legislature finds that deceptive promotional advertising of prizes is a matter vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

(2) Deceptive promotional advertising of prizes is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business. A violation of this chapter is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW, and constitutes an act of deceptive promotional advertising.

(3) This chapter applies to a promotion offer:

(a) Made to a person in Washington;

(b) Used to induce or invite a person to come to the state of Washington to claim a prize, attend a sales presentation, meet a promoter, sponsor, salesperson, or their agent, or conduct any business in this state; or

(c) Used to induce or invite a person to contact by any means a promoter, sponsor, salesperson, or their agent in this state.

[ 1991 c 227 s 1.]